Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-168
Perkins.

The county of Perkins is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township nine, north, of range forty-two, west, on the west boundary of Nebraska; thence east to the southeast corner of township nine, north, of range thirty-five, west; thence north to the northeast corner of section twenty-four, township twelve, west; thence west on section lines to the northwest corner of section nineteen, in township twelve, north, of range forty-one, west; thence south along the west line of said section nineteen to its intersection with the south boundary of Nebraska; thence east along said boundary line to the monument at the northeast corner of Colorado; thence south along the west boundary of Nebraska to the place of beginning.

Formed from Keith County pursuant to Laws 1879, § 10, p. 355, by vote of electors Nov. 8, 1887;

R.S.1913, § 883;

Laws 1921, c. 231, § 8, p. 826;

C.S.1922, § 785;

C.S.1929, § 25-172;

R.S.1943, § 22-168.